src/fst/morphology/ext-TRmorph/morph.lexc
! morph.lexc - main morphotactic description
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!

#include "options.h"
#include "multi-char.lexc"

! LEXICON Root
! Number; ! numbers are special as they are defined through a set of rules.
! Exceptions;
! 
!
! This part is the core lexicon. We do not what to leave any
! of these out. These files do not have lexicon definitions. 
! They only list the lexical items and their class.
!
! #include "lexicon/alpha"
! #include "lexicon/clitics"
! #include "lexicon/punctuation"
! #include "lexicon/qwords"
! #include "lexicon/adjective"
! #include "lexicon/adverb"
! #include "lexicon/conjunction"
! #include "lexicon/determiner"
! #include "lexicon/interjection"
! #include "lexicon/noun"
! #include "lexicon/proper_noun"
! #include "lexicon/onomatopoeia"
! #include "lexicon/postposition"
! #include "lexicon/pronoun"
! #include "lexicon/verb"
! 
! !
! ! These may be "optionalized", or replaced by a more rule-governed
! ! method in the future.
! !
! 
! #include "lexicon/abbreviation"
! #include "lexicon/part_word"
! 
! 
! !
! ! Definitions for numbers, including numeric forms (Arabic and Roman numerals)
! !
! 
! #include "number.lexc"
! #include "exceptions.lexc"


!
! Continuation class for symbols of the alphabet (when they are used
! literally)
!
! when inflected, we require apostrophe after letters (when required
! for porper names), e.g., 'şekil A'da görüldüğü gibi'.
!
LEXICON AlphaCont
%<Alpha%>:@RB   NPApos;
%<Alpha%>:@RB   ENDLEX;


!
! conjunctions
!

LEXICON CnjCoo
%<Cnj%:coo%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjAdv
%<Cnj%:adv%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjSub
%<Cnj%:sub%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

!
! The following are for multi-word or discontinuous conjunctions.
!
LEXICON CnjCooPart
%<Cnj%:coo%:partial%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjAdvPart
%<Cnj%:adv%:partial%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

!
! Postpositions
!

!
! non-case-marked complements
!

LEXICON nomPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:nomC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        nomPostP;

LEXICON nomPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON nomPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:nomC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        nomPostPKi;

LEXICON nomPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! genitive complements (note: this is different than the nominal
! complement case, where they are fine with genitive pronouns, but no
! other genitive complements)
!

LEXICON genPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:genC%>:@RB    AdvCont;


!
! accusative complements
!
LEXICON accPostPadj
%<Postp%:adv%:accC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                            accPostP;

LEXICON accPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:accC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

!
! dative complements
!

LEXICON datPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:datC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        datPostP;

LEXICON datPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:datC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON datPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:datC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        datPostPKi;

LEXICON datPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:datC%>:@RB    datPostPKiCont;

LEXICON datPostPKiCont
                            AdvCont;
                            Ki;
                            PostPTimeCont;

LEXICON PostPTimeCont
                            D_dir;
                            D_lArI;
                            D_lIGInA;
                            CliticSA;

!
! ablative complement
!

LEXICON ablPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:ablC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        ablPostP;

LEXICON ablPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON ablPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:ablC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        ablPostPKi;


LEXICON ablPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    Ki;
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    PostPTimeCont;

!
! instrumetnal/commutative complement
!

LEXICON insPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        insPostP;

LEXICON insPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:insC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON insPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! these require a complement with either -lI or -sIz
!

LEXICON liPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:liC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        liPostP;

LEXICON liPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON liPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:liC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        liPostPKi;

LEXICON liPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! these requrire a cardinal number as complement
!

LEXICON numPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:numC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        numPostP;

LEXICON numPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON numPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:numC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        numPostPKi;

LEXICON numPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! The follwing makes complex postpositons.
!

LEXICON PostPlocation
                PostPloc;
                PostPdat;
                PostPabl;

LEXICON PostPloc
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPlocCont;

LEXICON PostPlocCont
%<loc%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^A@MB     DerivedPostpCont;
%<loc%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^A@MB     Ki;

LEXICON PostPdat
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPdatCont;

LEXICON PostPdatCont
%<dat%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^(y)^A@MB   DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPins
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPinsCont;

LEXICON PostPinsCont
%<ins%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^(y)l^NS^A@MB  DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPabl
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPablCont;

LEXICON PostPablCont
%<abl%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^An@MB    DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPca
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPcaCont;

LEXICON PostPcaCont
%<ca%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^C^A@MB       DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON DerivedPostpCont
                                         AdvCont;
                                         NomPredicate;

!
! Possessive suffixes after adjectives and determiners make pronouns.
!
! TODO: The semantic difference between these are generally difficult
!       to get:
!
!       yeni<Adj><p3s><Prn>  `(a) new one'
!       yeni<Adj><0><N><p3s> `his/her new one = the new thing that he/she owns'
!       
!       And becomes more obscure in cases like this:
!
!       mavi<Adj><p2s><Prn>    `the thing that is a blue version of you'
!       mavi<Adj><0><N><p2s>   `the blue thing that you own'
!

LEXICON JP_poss
            JP_plu;
            JP_possessive;

LEXICON JP_plu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB              JP_possessive12p;

LEXICON     JP_possessive12p
%<p1p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p2p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB   NposCont;

LEXICON     JP_possessive
%<p1s%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:^(s)^I@MB     NposCont;
%<p3p%>%<Prn%>:l^Ar^I@MB     NposCont;
                             JP_possessive12p;

! besides adjectivals, the adverb `hep' also makes pronominals
! the same way. Instead of <p3s> version `hepi', the correct 
! form is `hepsi'. We allow `hepi', too, as it is used colloquially.
!
! The 1p and 2p singular forms are probably not possible.
! We allow them here.
!
LEXICON HepPrn
%<Adv%>%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:s^I@MB       NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:^(s)^I@MB    NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p1p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB  NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p2p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB  NposCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:s^I@MB         NposCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB      NposCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB    NposCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB    NposCont;

!
! onomatopoeic words
!
LEXICON Onom
%<Onom%>:@RB        OnomCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Onom%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    OnomCont;
#endif

LEXICON  OnomCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    Oderiv; ! TODO: this may be overgenerating

!
! interjections
!
! these do not have to be separate lexicons, but it makes things
! easier with old lexicon conversion.

LEXICON Interjection
%<Ij%>:@RB      InterjectionCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Ij%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    InterjectionCont;
#endif

LEXICON InterjectionCont
                  ENDLEX;
                  D_lA;

#if (ENDQUOTE_AS_NOUN == 1)
!
! This part handles the (nominal) suffixes following the quotation
! marks. This happens when a word, or even a complete sentence is put
! in quotation marks, and inflected as if it is a noun.
!   Examples:
!       ``Manisa  dosyası''nı
!       ``Çeşitli Kanunlarda Değişiklik Yapılmasına İlişkin Kanun''u
!
! TODO: the first example above does not work correctly (due to y -> n
!       alternation after -sI
!
